Hawaii statutes.
§431:10C-301.5 Covered loss deductible. Whenever
a person effects a recovery for bodily injury, whether by suit, arbitration, or
settlement, and it is determined that the person is entitled to recover
damages, the judgment, settlement, or award shall be reduced by $5,000 or the
amount of personal injury protection benefits incurred, whichever is greater,
up to the maximum limit. The covered loss deductible shall not include
benefits paid or incurred under any optional additional coverage, benefits paid
under any public assistance program, or benefits paid or incurred under chapter
386. [L 1997, c 251, pt of §2; am L 1998, c 275, §17; am L 2004, c 174, §2; am
L 2012, c 32, §1]

Case Notes

The covered loss deductible provision of this section applied
to the insureds' recovery of bodily injury damages under their uninsured
motorist coverage with insurer. 103 H. 142, 80 P.3d 321.

Where defendant failed to (1) raise the covered loss
deductible statute during the arbitration proceedings, (2) apply to the arbitration
administrator or the arbitration judge to reduce the awards, or (3) file a
notice of appeal and request a trial de novo, pursuant to Hawaii Arbitration
Rules rule 21, the arbitration awards were entered as unappealable final
judgments, which the trial court was precluded from modifying or vacating. 105
H. 93, 94 P.3d 648.

Applying the covered loss deductible under this section to
plaintiff's recovery of underinsured motorist benefits did not violate
plaintiff's constitutional right to substantive due process as the
legislature's policy determination to enact this section to reduce one of the
costs of the motor vehicle insurance system was expressly within the
constitutional purview of the legislature. 106 H. 511, 107 P.3d 440.

The covered loss deductible applies to underinsured motorist
coverage. 106 H. 511, 107 P.3d 440.

This section mandates that the "award shall be reduced
by the amount of personal injury protection (PIP) benefits"; as this
section does not state that the award should be reduced after apportionment by
the amount of PIP benefits, the covered loss deductible is to be deducted from
the "total damages" awarded by the trier of fact prior to
apportionment of the damages; thus, circuit court erred when it subtracted the
covered loss deductible from the jury's damage award after apportioning the
damages. 124 H. 236 (App.), 240 P.3d 899 (2010).

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next